Colorado, session 2026A, HB1148.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 19 to article
1 of title 6 as follows:
PART 19
PROTECTIONS FOR MINORS ON ONLINE GAMING SITES
6-1-1901. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS PART 19, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "ADD-ON TRANSACTION" MEANS AN ONLINE TRANSACTION
THROUGH WHICH A PLAYER OR PARTICIPANT IN AN ONLINE GAMING
SERVICE, PRODUCT, OR FEATURE ACQUIRES:
(a) AN ITEM OR ABILITY THAT PROVIDES THE PLAYER OR
PARTICIPANT AN ADVANTAGE OVER OTHER PLAYERS OR PARTICIPANTS; OR
(b) A FEATURE THAT ALTERS OR ENHANCES THE ONLINE GAMING
SERVICE, PRODUCT, OR FEATURE.
-3- HB26-1148

(2) "AFFILIATE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
6-1-1303 (1.5).
(3) "AGE ASSURANCE" MEANS A DETERMINATION, AN ESTIMATION,
OR A COMMUNICATION ABOUT THE AGE OR AGE RANGE OF A USER.
(4) "BUSINESS ASSOCIATE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN 45
CFR 160.103.
(5) "COLLECT" MEANS TO BUY, RENT, GATHER, OBTAIN, RECEIVE,
OR ACCESS PERSONAL DATA BY ANY MEANS, INCLUDING BY RECEIVING
DATA, EITHER ACTIVELY OR PASSIVELY, FROM A CONSUMER OR BY
OBSERVING A CONSUMER'S BEHAVIOR.
(6) "COMPULSIVE USE" MEANS THE REPETITIVE USE OF A COVERED
BUSINESS'S ONLINE GAMING SERVICE, PRODUCT, OR FEATURE, WHICH USE:
(a) MATERIALLY DISRUPTS ONE OR MORE MAJOR LIFE ACTIVITIES
OF A MINOR, INCLUDING SLEEPING, EATING, LEARNING, READING,
CONCENTRATING, COMMUNICATING, OR WORKING; OR
(b) SUBVERTS OR IMPAIRS A COVERED MINOR'S AUTONOMY,
DECISION-MAKING, OR CHOICE DURING THE USE OF THE ONLINE GAMING
SERVICE, PRODUCT, OR FEATURE.
(7) "COVERED BUSINESS" MEANS A SOLE PROPRIETORSHIP, A
PARTNERSHIP, A LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY, A CORPORATION, AN
ASSOCIATION, OR ANOTHER LEGAL ENTITY, OR AN AFFILIATE THEREOF,
THAT:
(a) CONDUCTS BUSINESS IN THIS STATE;
(b) GENERATES A MAJORITY OF ITS ANNUAL REVENUE FROM
ONLINE SERVICES;
(c) MAKES AVAILABLE ONLINE GAMING SERVICES, PRODUCTS, OR
FEATURES THAT ARE REASONABLY LIKELY TO BE ACCESSED BY A COVERED
-4- HB26-1148

MINOR;
(d) COLLECTS USERS' PERSONAL DATA OR HAS USERS' PERSONAL
DATA COLLECTED ON ITS BEHALF BY A PROCESSOR; AND
(e) SOLELY OR JOINTLY WITH OTHERS DETERMINES THE PURPOSES
AND MEANS OF THE PROCESSING OF USERS' PERSONAL DATA.
(8) "COVERED MINOR" MEANS A USER WHO A COVERED BUSINESS
KNOWS IS A MINOR OR LABELS AS A MINOR PURSUANT TO AGE ASSURANCE.
(9) "DE-IDENTIFIED DATA" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 6-1-1303 (11).
(10) "MINIMUM DUTY OF CARE" MEANS ENSURING THAT THE USE
OF THE PERSONAL DATA OF A COVERED MINOR AND THE DESIGN OF AN
ONLINE GAMING SERVICE, PRODUCT, OR FEATURE WILL NOT RESULT IN:
(a) REASONABLY FORESEEABLE EMOTIONAL DISTRESS TO A
COVERED MINOR;
(b) REASONABLY FORESEEABLE COMPULSIVE USE OF THE ONLINE
GAMING SERVICE, PRODUCT, OR FEATURE BY A COVERED MINOR; OR
(c) DISCRIMINATION AGAINST A COVERED MINOR BASED UPON
RACE, ETHNICITY, SEX, DISABILITY, SEXUAL ORIENTATION, GENDER
IDENTITY, GENDER EXPRESSION, RELIGION, OR NATIONAL ORIGIN.
(11) "MINOR" MEANS A USER WHO IS UNDER EIGHTEEN YEARS OLD.
(12) "ONLINE GAMING SERVICE, PRODUCT, OR FEATURE" MEANS AN
ONLINE SERVICE, PRODUCT, OR FEATURE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 6-1-1303
(16.8), THAT IS INTENDED TO FACILITATE ONLINE GAMING.
(13) "PERSONAL DATA" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
6-1-1303 (17).
(14) "PROCESS" OR "PROCESSING" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH
IN SECTION 6-1-1303 (18).
-5- HB26-1148

(15) "PROCESSOR" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
6-1-1303 (19).
(16) "REASONABLY LIKELY TO BE ACCESSED BY A COVERED
MINOR" MEANS AN ONLINE GAMING SERVICE, PRODUCT, OR FEATURE THAT
IS REASONABLY LIKELY TO BE ACCESSED BY A COVERED MINOR BASED ON
ANY OF THE FOLLOWING INDICATORS:
(a) THE ONLINE GAMING SERVICE, PRODUCT, OR FEATURE IS
DIRECTED TO CHILDREN, AS DESCRIBED BY THE FEDERAL "CHILDREN'S
ONLINE PRIVACY PROTECTION ACT OF 1998", 15 U.S.C. SECS. 6501 TO
6506, AND THE ASSOCIATED RULES OF THE FEDERAL TRADE COMMISSION;
(b) THE ONLINE GAMING SERVICE, PRODUCT, OR FEATURE IS
DETERMINED, BASED ON COMPETENT AND RELIABLE EVIDENCE REGARDING
AUDIENCE COMPOSITION, TO BE ROUTINELY ACCESSED BY AN AUDIENCE
THAT IS COMPOSED OF AT LEAST TWO PERCENT MINORS WHO ARE TWO
THROUGH SEVENTEEN YEARS OLD;
(c) THE AUDIENCE OF THE ONLINE GAMING SERVICE, PRODUCT, OR
FEATURE IS DETERMINED, BASED ON INTERNAL COMPANY RESEARCH, TO
BE COMPOSED OF AT LEAST TWO PERCENT MINORS WHO ARE TWO
THROUGH SEVENTEEN YEARS OLD; OR
(d) THE COVERED BUSINESS KNEW OR SHOULD HAVE KNOWN THAT
AT LEAST TWO PERCENT OF THE AUDIENCE OF THE ONLINE GAMING
SERVICE, PRODUCT, OR FEATURE IS COMPOSED OF MINORS WHO ARE TWO
THROUGH SEVENTEEN YEARS OLD; EXCEPT THAT, IN MAKING THIS
ASSESSMENT, THE BUSINESS SHALL NOT COLLECT OR PROCESS ANY
PERSONAL DATA THAT IS NOT REASONABLY NECESSARY TO PROVIDE AN
ONLINE GAMING SERVICE, PRODUCT, OR FEATURE WITH WHICH A MINOR IS
ACTIVELY AND KNOWINGLY ENGAGED.
-6- HB26-1148

(17) "USER" MEANS A USER OF ONE OR MORE ONLINE GAMING
SERVICES, PRODUCTS, OR FEATURES WHO RESIDES IN THE STATE.
6-1-1902. Minimum duty of care.
(1) ON AND AFTER DECEMBER 1, 2026, A COVERED BUSINESS THAT
PROCESSES A COVERED MINOR'S PERSONAL DATA IN ANY CAPACITY OWES
A MINIMUM DUTY OF CARE TO THE COVERED MINOR.
(2) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE
A COVERED BUSINESS TO PREVENT OR PRECLUDE A COVERED MINOR FROM
ACCESSING OR VIEWING ANY ITEM OF MEDIA OR CATEGORY OF MEDIA.
6-1-1903. Default privacy settings required - tool for timely
deletion of accounts required.
(1) Default privacy settings.
(a) ON AND AFTER DECEMBER 1, 2026, A COVERED BUSINESS
SHALL CONFIGURE ALL DEFAULT PRIVACY SETTINGS PROVIDED TO A
COVERED MINOR THROUGH AN ONLINE GAMING SERVICE, PRODUCT, OR
FEATURE TO THE HIGHEST LEVEL OF PRIVACY, INCLUDING THE FOLLOWING
DEFAULT SETTINGS:
(I) NOT DISPLAYING THE EXISTENCE OF THE COVERED MINOR'S
ACCOUNT TO AN ADULT USER UNLESS THE COVERED MINOR EXPRESSLY
AND UNAMBIGUOUSLY ALLOWS THE ADULT USER TO VIEW THE COVERED
MINOR'S ACCOUNT OR THE COVERED MINOR EXPRESSLY AND
UNAMBIGUOUSLY CHOOSES TO MAKE THEIR ACCOUNT'S EXISTENCE PUBLIC;
(II) NOT DISPLAYING MEDIA CREATED OR POSTED BY THE COVERED
MINOR TO AN ADULT USER UNLESS THE COVERED MINOR EXPRESSLY AND
UNAMBIGUOUSLY ALLOWS THE ADULT USER TO VIEW THE COVERED
MINOR'S MEDIA OR THE COVERED MINOR EXPRESSLY AND
UNAMBIGUOUSLY CHOOSES TO MAKE THEIR MEDIA PUBLICLY AVAILABLE;
-7- HB26-1148

(III) NOT PERMITTING AN ADULT USER TO LIKE, COMMENT ON, OR
OTHERWISE PROVIDE FEEDBACK ON THE COVERED MINOR'S MEDIA UNLESS
THE COVERED MINOR EXPRESSLY AND UNAMBIGUOUSLY ALLOWS THE
ADULT USER TO DO SO;
(IV) NOT PERMITTING DIRECT MESSAGING BETWEEN THE COVERED
MINOR AND AN ADULT USER UNLESS THE COVERED MINOR EXPRESSLY AND
UNAMBIGUOUSLY ALLOWS DIRECT MESSAGING WITH THE ADULT USER;
(V) NOT DISPLAYING THE COVERED MINOR'S LOCATION TO OTHER
USERS UNLESS THE COVERED MINOR EXPRESSLY AND UNAMBIGUOUSLY
SHARES THEIR LOCATION WITH A SPECIFIC USER;
(VI) NOT DISPLAYING TO ANY USER THE USERS WHO ARE
CONNECTED TO THE COVERED MINOR UNLESS THE COVERED MINOR
EXPRESSLY AND UNAMBIGUOUSLY CHOOSES TO SHARE THE INFORMATION
WITH THE USER;
(VII) DISABLING SEARCH ENGINE INDEXING OF THE COVERED
MINOR'S ACCOUNT PROFILE; AND
(VIII) NOT SENDING PUSH NOTIFICATIONS TO THE COVERED MINOR.
(b) ON AND AFTER DECEMBER 1, 2026, A COVERED BUSINESS
SHALL NOT:
(I) PROVIDE A COVERED MINOR WITH A SINGLE SETTING THAT
MAKES ALL OF THE DEFAULT PRIVACY SETTINGS LESS PROTECTIVE AT
ONCE; OR
(II) REQUEST OR PROMPT A COVERED MINOR TO MAKE THEIR
PRIVACY SETTINGS LESS PROTECTIVE.
(2) Timely deletion of account. ON AND AFTER DECEMBER 1,
2026, A COVERED BUSINESS SHALL:
(a) PROVIDE A PROMINENT, ACCESSIBLE, AND RESPONSIVE TOOL TO
-8- HB26-1148

ALLOW A COVERED MINOR TO REQUEST THAT THE COVERED MINOR'S
ACCOUNT BE UNPUBLISHED OR DELETED; AND
(b) HONOR A REQUEST DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS
SECTION NOT LATER THAN FIFTEEN DAYS AFTER THE COVERED BUSINESS
RECEIVES THE REQUEST.
6-1-1904. Prohibited data and design practices - data privacy
- compulsive use.
(1) Data privacy. ON AND AFTER DECEMBER 1, 2026, A COVERED
BUSINESS SHALL NOT:
(a) COLLECT, SELL, SHARE, OR RETAIN PERSONAL DATA OF A
COVERED MINOR THAT IS NOT NECESSARY TO PROVIDE AN ONLINE GAMING
SERVICE, PRODUCT, OR FEATURE WITH WHICH THE COVERED MINOR IS
ACTIVELY AND KNOWINGLY ENGAGED;
(b) USE PREVIOUSLY COLLECTED PERSONAL DATA OF A COVERED
MINOR FOR ANY PURPOSE OTHER THAN A PURPOSE FOR WHICH THE
PERSONAL DATA WAS COLLECTED, UNLESS SUCH USE IS NECESSARY TO
COMPLY WITH AN OBLIGATION UNDER THIS PART 19;
(c) PERMIT AN INDIVIDUAL, INCLUDING A PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF
A COVERED MINOR, TO MONITOR THE ONLINE ACTIVITY OF A COVERED
MINOR OR TO TRACK THE LOCATION OF THE COVERED MINOR WITHOUT
PROVIDING A CONSPICUOUS SIGNAL TO THE COVERED MINOR WHEN THE
COVERED MINOR IS BEING MONITORED OR TRACKED;
(d) USE THE PERSONAL DATA OF A COVERED MINOR TO SELECT,
RECOMMEND, OR PRIORITIZE MEDIA FOR THE COVERED MINOR, UNLESS:
(I) THE COVERED MINOR EXPRESSLY AND UNAMBIGUOUSLY
REQUESTS TO RECEIVE:
(A) MEDIA FROM A SPECIFIC ACCOUNT, FEED, OR USER OR TO
-9- HB26-1148

RECEIVE MORE OR LESS MEDIA FROM AN ACCOUNT, FEED, OR USER; OR
(B) A SPECIFIC CATEGORY OF MEDIA OR TO SEE MORE OR LESS OF
A SPECIFIC CATEGORY OF MEDIA;
(II) THE PERSONAL DATA IS USED TO SET OR RESET PRIVACY OR
ACCESSIBILITY SETTINGS; OR
(III) THE PERSONAL DATA IS USED TO PRIORITIZE MEDIA IN
RESPONSE TO A SEARCH QUERY BY THE COVERED MINOR; OR
(e) SEND PUSH NOTIFICATIONS TO A COVERED MINOR BETWEEN 12
MIDNIGHT AND 6 A.M.
(2) Compulsive use. ON AND AFTER DECEMBER 1, 2026, A
COVERED BUSINESS SHALL NOT IMPLEMENT DATA PROCESSING OR DESIGN
PRACTICES THAT LEAD TO COMPULSIVE USE OF AN ONLINE GAMING
SERVICE, PRODUCT, OR FEATURE.
6-1-1905. Privacy protections for age assurance data.
(1) ON AND AFTER DECEMBER 1, 2026, WHEN CONDUCTING AGE
ASSURANCE, A COVERED BUSINESS OR PROCESSOR SHALL:
(a) COLLECT ONLY THE PERSONAL DATA OF A USER THAT IS
NECESSARY FOR THE PURPOSE OF AGE ASSURANCE;
(b) UPON DETERMINING THAT A USER IS A COVERED MINOR,
IMMEDIATELY DELETE ALL DATA THAT RELATES TO THE DETERMINATION
OF THE USER'S AGE;
(c) NOT USE A USER'S PERSONAL DATA FOR ANY PURPOSE OTHER
THAN AGE ASSURANCE;
(d) NOT COMBINE A USER'S PERSONAL DATA WITH ANY OTHER
USER'S PERSONAL DATA, EXCEPT FOR THE PURPOSE OF AGGREGATING
DE-IDENTIFIED DATA;
(e) NOT DISCLOSE A USER'S PERSONAL DATA TO A THIRD PARTY
-10- HB26-1148

THAT IS NOT A PROCESSOR; AND
(f) IMPLEMENT A REVIEW PROCESS TO ALLOW A USER TO APPEAL
THE DETERMINATION OF THEIR AGE.
6-1-1906. Transactions involving covered minors - prices to be
listed in U.S. dollars - fees for add-on transactions.
(1) A COVERED BUSINESS SHALL ENSURE THAT THE PURCHASE
PRICE FOR AN ONLINE GAMING SERVICE, PRODUCT, OR FEATURE THAT IS
MADE AVAILABLE THROUGH THE COVERED BUSINESS'S ONLINE GAMING
SERVICE, PRODUCT, OR FEATURE AND THAT IS REASONABLY LIKELY TO BE
ACCESSED BY A COVERED MINOR IS LISTED IN UNITED STATES DOLLARS AT
THE POINT OF SALE.
(2) A COVERED BUSINESS SHALL IMPOSE AND COLLECT A FEE ON
EACH ADD-ON TRANSACTION THAT IS CONDUCTED BY A COVERED MINOR
THROUGH THE COVERED BUSINESS'S ONLINE GAMING SERVICE, PRODUCT,
OR FEATURE. THE AMOUNT OF THE FEE IS FIVE PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT
OF THE TRANSACTION. A COVERED BUSINESS SHALL TRANSFER MONEY
COLLECTED AS FEES PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2) TO THE STATE
TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT THE MONEY TO THE STATE PUBLIC
SCHOOL FUND CREATED IN SECTION 22-54-114.
6-1-1907. Enforcement - unfair or deceptive trade practice.
A COVERED BUSINESS OR PROCESSOR THAT VIOLATES THIS PART 19
OR RULES ADOPTED PURSUANT TO THIS PART 19 COMMITS AN UNFAIR OR
DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 6-1-105 (1)(qqqq).
6-1-1908. Limitations and exclusions.
(1) NOTHING IN THIS PART 19 SHALL BE INTERPRETED OR
CONSTRUED TO:
(a) IMPOSE LIABILITY IN A MANNER THAT IS INCONSISTENT WITH 47
-11- HB26-1148

U.S.C. SEC. 230; OR
(b) PREVENT OR PRECLUDE A COVERED MINOR FROM
DELIBERATELY OR INDEPENDENTLY SEARCHING FOR, OR SPECIFICALLY
REQUESTING, ANY MEDIA.
(2) THIS PART 19 DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(a) A FEDERAL, STATE, TRIBAL, OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT ENTITY IN
THE ORDINARY COURSE OF ITS OPERATION;
(b) PROTECTED HEALTH INFORMATION THAT A COVERED BUSINESS
OR BUSINESS ASSOCIATE PROCESSES IN ACCORDANCE WITH, OR
DOCUMENTS THAT A COVERED BUSINESS OR BUSINESS ASSOCIATE CREATES
FOR THE PURPOSE OF COMPLYING WITH, THE FEDERAL "HEALTH
INSURANCE PORTABILITY AND ACCOUNTABILITY ACT OF 1996", PUB.L.
104-191;
(c) INFORMATION THAT IS USED ONLY FOR PUBLIC HEALTH
ACTIVITIES AS DESCRIBED IN 45 CFR 164.512; OR
(d) INFORMATION THAT IDENTIFIES A USER IN CONNECTION WITH:
(I) ACTIVITIES THAT ARE SUBJECT TO THE "FEDERAL POLICY FOR
THE PROTECTION OF HUMAN SUBJECTS", AS SET FORTH IN 45 CFR 46;
(II) RESEARCH ON HUMAN SUBJECTS UNDERTAKEN IN
ACCORDANCE WITH GOOD CLINICAL PRACTICE GUIDELINES ISSUED BY THE
INTERNATIONAL COUNCIL FOR HARMONISATION OF TECHNICAL
REQUIREMENTS FOR PHARMACEUTICALS FOR HUMAN USE OR ITS
SUCCESSOR ORGANIZATION;
(III) ACTIVITIES THAT ARE PROTECTED UNDER 21 CFR 50 AND 56;
(IV) RESEARCH CONDUCTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (2)(d)(I), (2)(d)(II), OR
(2)(d)(III) OF THIS SECTION OR OTHERWISE IN ACCORDANCE WITH STATE
-12- HB26-1148

OR FEDERAL LAW;
(V) AN ENTITY WITH A PRIMARY PURPOSE OF JOURNALISM AND A
WORKFORCE WHOSE MAJORITY CONSISTS OF INDIVIDUALS ENGAGING IN
JOURNALISM; OR
(VI) A FINANCIAL INSTITUTION SUBJECT TO TITLE V OF THE
FEDERAL "GRAMM-LEACH-BLILEY ACT", PUB.L. 106-102, AND
REGULATIONS ADOPTED TO IMPLEMENT THAT ACT.
6-1-1909. Rights and freedoms of covered minors.
NOTHING IN THIS PART 19 SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO INFRINGE ON
THE RIGHTS AND FREEDOMS OF COVERED MINORS OR BE CONSTRUED TO
DISCRIMINATE AGAINST A COVERED MINOR BASED ON RACE, ETHNICITY,
SEX, DISABILITY, SEXUAL ORIENTATION, GENDER IDENTITY, GENDER
EXPRESSION, RELIGION, OR NATIONAL ORIGIN.
6-1-1910. Rules.
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY ADOPT RULES FOR THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS PART 19, INCLUDING RULES ESTABLISHING
PERMISSIBLE METHODS BY WHICH A COVERED BUSINESS MAY DETERMINE
THE AGE OF A COVERED MINOR.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-1-105, add
(1)(qqqq) as follows:
6-1-105. Unfair or deceptive trade practices - definitions.
(1) A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in the
course of the person's business, vocation, or occupation, the person:
(qqqq) VIOLATES PART 19 OF THIS ARTICLE 1.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 6-1-1602 and
6-1-1603 as follows:
6-1-1602. Transparency - privacy - disclosures regarding the
-13- HB26-1148

use of algorithmic recommendation systems - definitions.
(1) ON AND AFTER DECEMBER 1, 2026, A SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM
SHALL PROMINENTLY AND CLEARLY PROVIDE ON ITS WEBSITE OR MOBILE
APPLICATION:
(a) THE SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM'S TERMS OF SERVICE, POLICIES,
AND COMMUNITY STANDARDS;
(b) THE SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM'S POLICIES CONCERNING USERS'
PRIVACY;
(c) THE PURPOSE OF EACH ALGORITHMIC RECOMMENDATION
SYSTEM IN USE BY THE SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM;
(d) INPUTS USED BY EACH ALGORITHMIC RECOMMENDATION
SYSTEM IN USE BY THE SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM, INCLUDING HOW EACH
INPUT:
(I) IS MEASURED OR DETERMINED;
(II) USES THE PERSONAL DATA OF MINOR USERS;
(III) INFLUENCES A RECOMMENDATION ISSUED BY THE SYSTEM;
AND
(IV) IS WEIGHED RELATIVE TO THE OTHER INPUTS DESCRIBED IN
THIS SUBSECTION (1)(d); AND
(e) FOR EVERY FEATURE OF A WEBSITE OR MOBILE APPLICATION
THAT USES THE PERSONAL DATA OF A MINOR USER, DESCRIPTIONS OF:
(I) THE PURPOSE OF THE WEBSITE OR MOBILE APPLICATION;
(II) THE PERSONAL DATA COLLECTED BY THE WEBSITE OR MOBILE
APPLICATION;
(III) THE PERSONAL DATA USED BY THE WEBSITE OR MOBILE
APPLICATION;
(IV) HOW THE PERSONAL DATA IS USED BY THE WEBSITE OR
-14- HB26-1148

MOBILE APPLICATION;
(V) ANY PERSONAL DATA TRANSFERRED TO OR SHARED WITH A
PROCESSOR OR THIRD PARTY BY THE WEBSITE OR MOBILE APPLICATION,
THE IDENTITY OF THE PROCESSOR OR THIRD PARTY, AND THE PURPOSE OF
THE TRANSFER OR SHARING; AND
(VI) HOW LONG THE PERSONAL DATA IS RETAINED BY THE WEBSITE
OR MOBILE APPLICATION.
(2) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "ALGORITHMIC RECOMMENDATION SYSTEM" MEANS A SYSTEM
THAT USES AN ALGORITHM TO SELECT, FILTER, AND ARRANGE MEDIA ON
A SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM'S WEBSITE OR MOBILE APPLICATION FOR THE
PURPOSE OF SELECTING, RECOMMENDING, OR PRIORITIZING MEDIA FOR A
USER.
(b) "MINOR USER" MEANS A USER OF A SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM
WHO IS UNDER EIGHTEEN YEARS OLD.
(c) "PERSONAL DATA" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
6-1-1303 (17).
(d) "PROCESSOR" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
6-1-1303 (19).
(e) "SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 6-1-1601 (4).
6-1-1603. Use of algorithmic recommendation systems for
sales of illicit substances to minors prohibited - definitions.
(1) A SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM SHALL NOT USE AN ALGORITHMIC
RECOMMENDATION SYSTEM TO SELL OR OTHERWISE DISTRIBUTE AN ILLICIT
SUBSTANCE TO A MINOR USER.
-15- HB26-1148

(2) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "ALGORITHMIC RECOMMENDATION SYSTEM" HAS THE MEANING
SET FORTH IN SECTION 6-1-1602 (2)(a).
(b) (I) "ILLICIT SUBSTANCE" MEANS:
(A) A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
18-18-102 (5);
(B) A HEMP PRODUCT, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 25-5-427 (2)(d),
THAT IS NOT A TINCTURE OR COSMETIC AND HAS MORE THAN ONE AND
ONE-FOURTH MILLIGRAMS OF THC, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 44-10-209
(2)(d), PER SERVING OR HAS A RATIO OF CANNABIDIOL TO THC OF LESS
THAN TWENTY TO ONE; AND
(C) A PRODUCT THAT CONTAINS HEMP THAT IS INTENDED FOR
HUMAN CONSUMPTION AND IS NOT A COSMETIC, A DIETARY SUPPLEMENT,
A FOOD, A FOOD ADDITIVE, OR AN HERB.
(II) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (2)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION,
"ILLICIT SUBSTANCE" DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(A) A PRODUCT THAT MAY BE PRODUCED AND SOLD IN COLORADO
PURSUANT TO AND IN COMPLIANCE WITH SECTION 25-5-427, ARTICLE 10
OF TITLE 44, AND RULES ADOPTED PURSUANT TO SUCH PROVISIONS; OR
(B) A PRODUCT THAT MAY BE PRODUCED FOR PERSONAL USE OR
PRODUCED AND ADMINISTERED FOR NATURAL MEDICINE SERVICES
PURSUANT TO AND IN COMPLIANCE WITH ARTICLE 170 OF TITLE 12,
SECTION 18-18-434, ARTICLE 50 OF TITLE 44, AND RULES ADOPTED
PURSUANT TO SUCH PROVISIONS.
(c) "MINOR USER" MEANS A USER OF A SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM
WHO IS UNDER EIGHTEEN YEARS OLD.
-16- HB26-1148

(d) "SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 6-1-1601 (4).
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-54-114, amend
(1) as follows:
22-54-114. State public school fund.
(1) (a) There is hereby created in the office of the state treasurer
a fund, separate from the general fund, to be known as the state public
school fund. There THE FOLLOWING MONEY shall be credited to said THE
STATE PUBLIC SCHOOL fund:
(I) The net balance of the public school income fund existing as of
December 31, 1973, and all distributions from the state public school
income fund thereafter made THEREAFTER;
(II) The state's share of all moneys MONEY received from the
federal government pursuant to the provisions of section 34-63-102;
C.R.S.,
(III) MONEY RECEIVED AS FEES PURSUANT TO SECTION 6-1-1906
(2); and
(IV) Such additional moneys MONEY as shall be IS appropriated
AS NECESSARY by the general assembly which are necessary to meet the
state's share of the total program of all districts, funding for institute
charter schools, and, for fiscal years prior to the 2007-08 fiscal year, the
contingency reserve during the budget year.
(b) Moneys MONEY annually appropriated by the general
assembly shall be transferred from the state general fund and credited to
the state public school fund in four quarterly installments on July 1,
September 30, December 31, and March 31 to assure ENSURE the
availability of funds for the required distribution of state moneys MONEY
-17- HB26-1148

to school districts and institute charter schools. Such THE quarterly
installments shall be determined in accordance with estimates prepared
by the department of education with respect to the required distribution
of state moneys MONEY to school districts and institute charter schools.
SECTION 5. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to conduct occurring on or after the applicable
effective date of this act.
-18- HB26-1148